Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.380

Comprehensive plan—Public hearing required.

Before approving all or any part of the comprehensive plan or any amendment, extension or addition thereto, the commission shall hold at least one public hearing and may hold additional hearings at the discretion of the commission.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.380. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 38.]